Illinois, session 104th, HB3219.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Wildlife Code is amended by changing 5Sections 1.2bb, 2.25, and 2.33 and by adding Sections 1.2t-2 6and 1.2t-3 as follows: 7    (520 ILCS 5/1.2t-2 new)8    Sec. 1.2t-2. Straight-walled centerfire cartridge. 9"Straight-walled centerfire cartridge" means a cartridge that 10is used as ammunition in a centerfire and that has a diameter 11that is the same across its length and a metallic casing that 12extends to the projectile. 13    (520 ILCS 5/1.2t-3 new)14    Sec. 1.2t-3. Wildlife rifle. "Wildlife rifle" means a 15centerfire rifle that can hold up to 3 rounds in the magazine 16and chamber combined. 17    (520 ILCS 5/2.25)  (from Ch. 61, par. 2.25)18    Sec. 2.25. It shall be unlawful for any person to take deer 19except (i) with a shotgun, handgun, wildlife single shot 20centerfire rifle, or muzzleloading rifle or (ii) as provided 21by administrative rule, with a bow and arrow, during the open   HB3219- 2 -LRB104 06451 BDA 16487 b1season of not more than 14 days which will be set annually by 2the Director between the dates of November 1st and December 331st, both inclusive, or a special 3-day, youth-only season 4between the dates of September 1 and October 31. For the 5purposes of this Section, legal handguns and rifles are 6limited to centerfire handguns that are either a single shot 7or revolver and centerfire wildlife rifles that are single 8shot. The only legal ammunition for a centerfire handgun or 9rifle is a bottleneck centerfire cartridge of .30 caliber or 10larger with a case length not exceeding one and two-fifths 11inches, or a straight-walled centerfire cartridge of .30 12caliber or larger, both of which must be available as a factory 13load with the published ballistic tables of the manufacturer 14showing a capability of at least 500 foot pounds of energy at 15the muzzle. The barrel of a handgun shall be at least 4 inches. 16Full metal jacket bullets may not be used to harvest deer.17    The Department shall make administrative rules concerning 18management restrictions applicable to the firearm and bow and 19arrow season.20    It shall be unlawful for any person to take deer except 21with a bow and arrow during the open season for bow and arrow 22set annually by the Director between the dates of September 231st and January 31st, both inclusive.24    It shall be unlawful for any person to take deer except 25with (i) a muzzleloading rifle or (ii) bow and arrow during the 26open season for muzzleloading rifles set annually by the   HB3219- 3 -LRB104 06451 BDA 16487 b1Director.2    The Director shall cause an administrative rule setting 3forth the prescribed rules and regulations, including bag and 4possession limits and those counties of the State where open 5seasons are established, to be published in accordance with 6Sections 1.3 and 1.13 of this Act.7    The Department may establish separate harvest periods for 8the purpose of managing or eradicating disease that has been 9found in the deer herd. This season shall be restricted to gun 10or bow and arrow hunting only. The Department shall publicly 11announce, via statewide news release, the season dates and 12shooting hours, the counties and sites open to hunting.13    The Department is authorized to establish a separate 14harvest period at specific sites within the State for the 15purpose of harvesting surplus deer that cannot be taken during 16the regular season provided for the taking of deer. This 17season shall be restricted to gun or bow and arrow hunting only 18and shall be established during the period of September 1st to 19February 15th, both inclusive. The Department shall publicly 20announce, via statewide news release, the season dates and 21shooting hours, and the counties and sites open to hunting. 22The Department shall publish suitable prescribed rules and 23regulations established by administrative rule pertaining to 24management restrictions applicable to this special harvest 25program. The Department shall allow unused gun deer permits 26that are left over from a regular season for the taking of deer   HB3219- 4 -LRB104 06451 BDA 16487 b1to be rolled over and used during any separate harvest period 2held within 6 months of the season for which those tags were 3issued at no additional cost to the permit holder subject to 4the management restrictions applicable to the special harvest 5program. 6    Beginning July 1, 2019, and on an annual basis thereafter, 7the Department shall provide a report to the General Assembly 8providing information regarding deer management programs 9established by the Code or by administrative rule that 10includes: (1) the number of surplus deer taken during each 11separate harvest season; (2) the number of deer found to have a 12communicable disease or other abnormality; and (3) what 13happens to the deer taken during each separate harvest season. 14(Source: P.A. 101-66, eff. 7-12-19; 102-314, eff. 1-1-22; 15102-932, eff. 1-1-23.) 16    (520 ILCS 5/2.33)17    Sec. 2.33. Prohibitions. 18    (a) It is unlawful to carry or possess any gun in any State 19refuge unless otherwise permitted by administrative rule.20    (b) It is unlawful to use or possess any snare or 21snare-like device, deadfall, net, or pit trap to take any 22species, except that snares not powered by springs or other 23mechanical devices may be used to trap fur-bearing mammals, in 24water sets only, if at least one-half of the snare noose is 25located underwater at all times.  HB3219- 5 -LRB104 06451 BDA 16487 b1    (c) It is unlawful for any person at any time to take a 2wild mammal protected by this Act from its den by means of any 3mechanical device, spade, or digging device or to use smoke or 4other gases to dislodge or remove such mammal except as 5provided in Section 2.37.6    (d) It is unlawful to use a ferret or any other small 7mammal which is used in the same or similar manner for which 8ferrets are used for the purpose of frightening or driving any 9mammals from their dens or hiding places.10    (e) (Blank).11    (f) It is unlawful to use spears, gigs, hooks, or any like 12device to take any species protected by this Act.13    (g) It is unlawful to use poisons, chemicals, or 14explosives for the purpose of taking any species protected by 15this Act.16    (h) It is unlawful to hunt adjacent to or near any peat, 17grass, brush, or other inflammable substance when it is 18burning.19    (i) It is unlawful to take, pursue or intentionally harass 20or disturb in any manner any wild birds or mammals by use or 21aid of any vehicle, conveyance, or unmanned aircraft as 22defined by the Illinois Aeronautics Act, except as permitted 23by the Code of Federal Regulations for the taking of 24waterfowl; except that nothing in this subsection shall 25prohibit the use of unmanned aircraft in the inspection of a 26public utility facility, tower, or structure or a mobile   HB3219- 6 -LRB104 06451 BDA 16487 b1service facility, tower, or structure by a public utility, as 2defined in Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act, or a 3provider of mobile services as defined in Section 153 of Title 447 of the United States Code. It is also unlawful to use the 5lights of any vehicle or conveyance, any light connected to 6any vehicle or conveyance, or any other lighting device or 7mechanism from inside or on a vehicle or conveyance in any area 8where wildlife may be found except in accordance with Section 92.37 of this Act; however, nothing in this Section shall 10prohibit the normal use of headlamps for the purpose of 11driving upon a roadway. For purposes of this Section, any 12other lighting device or mechanism shall include, but not be 13limited to, any device that uses infrared or other light not 14visible to the naked eye, electronic image intensification, 15active illumination, thermal imaging, or night vision. Striped 16skunk, opossum, red fox, gray fox, raccoon, bobcat, and coyote 17may be taken during the open season by use of a small light 18which is worn on the body or hand-held by a person on foot and 19not in any vehicle.20    (j) It is unlawful to use any shotgun larger than 10 gauge 21while taking or attempting to take any of the species 22protected by this Act.23    (k) It is unlawful to use or possess in the field any 24shotgun shell loaded with a shot size larger than lead BB or 25steel T (.20 diameter) when taking or attempting to take any 26species of wild game mammals (excluding white-tailed deer),   HB3219- 7 -LRB104 06451 BDA 16487 b1wild game birds, migratory waterfowl or migratory game birds 2protected by this Act, except white-tailed deer as provided 3for in Section 2.26 and other species as provided for by 4subsection (l) or administrative rule.5    (l) It is unlawful to take any species of wild game, except 6white-tailed deer and fur-bearing mammals, with a shotgun 7loaded with slugs unless otherwise provided for by 8administrative rule.9    (m) It is unlawful to use any shotgun capable of holding 10more than 3 shells in the magazine or chamber combined, except 11on game breeding and hunting preserve areas licensed under 12Section 3.27 and except as permitted by the Code of Federal 13Regulations for the taking of waterfowl. If the shotgun is 14capable of holding more than 3 shells, it shall, while being 15used on an area other than a game breeding and shooting 16preserve area licensed pursuant to Section 3.27, be fitted 17with a one-piece plug that is irremovable without dismantling 18the shotgun or otherwise altered to render it incapable of 19holding more than 3 shells in the magazine and chamber, 20combined.21    (n) It is unlawful for any person, except persons who 22possess a permit to hunt from a vehicle as provided in this 23Section and persons otherwise permitted by law, to have or 24carry any gun in or on any vehicle, conveyance, or aircraft, 25unless such gun is unloaded and enclosed in a case, except that 26at field trials authorized by Section 2.34 of this Act,   HB3219- 8 -LRB104 06451 BDA 16487 b1unloaded guns or guns loaded with blank cartridges only may be 2carried on horseback while not contained in a case, or to have 3or carry any bow or arrow device in or on any vehicle unless 4such bow or arrow device is unstrung or enclosed in a case, or 5otherwise made inoperable unless in accordance with the 6Firearm Concealed Carry Act.7    (o) (Blank).8    (p) It is unlawful to take game birds, migratory game 9birds or migratory waterfowl with a rifle, pistol, revolver, 10or air rifle.11    (q) It is unlawful to fire a rifle, pistol, revolver, or 12air rifle on, over, or into any waters of this State, including 13frozen waters.14    (r) It is unlawful to discharge any gun or bow and arrow 15device along, upon, across, or from any public right-of-way or 16highway in this State.17    (s) It is unlawful to use a silencer or other device to 18muffle or mute the sound of the explosion or report resulting 19from the firing of any gun.20    (t) It is unlawful for any person to take or attempt to 21take any species of wildlife or parts thereof, or allow a dog 22to hunt, within or upon the land of another, or upon waters 23flowing over or standing on the land of another, or to 24knowingly shoot a gun or bow and arrow device at any wildlife 25physically on or flying over the property of another without 26first obtaining permission from the owner or the owner's   HB3219- 9 -LRB104 06451 BDA 16487 b1designee. For the purposes of this Section, the owner's 2designee means anyone who the owner designates in a written 3authorization and the authorization must contain (i) the legal 4or common description of property for which such authority is 5given, (ii) the extent that the owner's designee is authorized 6to make decisions regarding who is allowed to take or attempt 7to take any species of wildlife or parts thereof, and (iii) the 8owner's notarized signature. Before enforcing this Section, 9the law enforcement officer must have received notice from the 10owner or the owner's designee of a violation of this Section. 11Statements made to the law enforcement officer regarding this 12notice shall not be rendered inadmissible by the hearsay rule 13when offered for the purpose of showing the required notice.14    (u) It is unlawful for any person to discharge any firearm 15for the purpose of taking any of the species protected by this 16Act, or hunt with gun or dog, or allow a dog to hunt, within 17300 yards of an inhabited dwelling without first obtaining 18permission from the owner or tenant, except that while 19trapping, hunting with bow and arrow, hunting with dog and 20shotgun using shot shells only, or hunting with shotgun using 21shot shells only, or providing outfitting services under a 22waterfowl outfitter permit, or on licensed game breeding and 23hunting preserve areas, as defined in Section 3.27, on 24federally owned and managed lands and on Department owned, 25managed, leased, or controlled lands, a 100 yard restriction 26shall apply.  HB3219- 10 -LRB104 06451 BDA 16487 b1    (v) It is unlawful for any person to remove fur-bearing 2mammals from, or to move or disturb in any manner, the traps 3owned by another person without written authorization of the 4owner to do so.5    (w) It is unlawful for any owner of a dog to allow his or 6her dog to pursue, harass, or kill deer, except that nothing in 7this Section shall prohibit the tracking of wounded deer with 8a dog in accordance with the provisions of Section 2.26 of this 9Code.10    (x) It is unlawful for any person to wantonly or 11carelessly injure or destroy, in any manner whatsoever, any 12real or personal property on the land of another while engaged 13in hunting or trapping thereon.14    (y) It is unlawful to hunt wild game protected by this Act 15between one-half hour after sunset and one-half hour before 16sunrise, except that hunting hours between one-half hour after 17sunset and one-half hour before sunrise may be established by 18administrative rule for fur-bearing mammals.19    (z) It is unlawful to take any game bird (excluding wild 20turkeys and crippled pheasants not capable of normal flight 21and otherwise irretrievable) protected by this Act when not 22flying. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit a person from 23carrying an uncased, unloaded shotgun in a boat, while in 24pursuit of a crippled migratory waterfowl that is incapable of 25normal flight, for the purpose of attempting to reduce the 26migratory waterfowl to possession, provided that the attempt   HB3219- 11 -LRB104 06451 BDA 16487 b1is made immediately upon downing the migratory waterfowl and 2is done within 400 yards of the blind from which the migratory 3waterfowl was downed. This exception shall apply only to 4migratory game birds that are not capable of normal flight. 5Migratory waterfowl that are crippled may be taken only with a 6shotgun as regulated by subsection (j) of this Section using 7shotgun shells as regulated in subsection (k) of this Section.8    (aa) It is unlawful to use or possess any device that may 9be used for tree climbing or cutting while hunting fur-bearing 10mammals, excluding coyotes. However, coyotes may not be hunted 11utilizing these devices during open season for deer except by 12properly licensed deer hunters.13    (bb) It is unlawful for any person, except licensed game 14breeders, pursuant to Section 2.29 to import, carry into, or 15possess alive in this State any species of wildlife taken 16outside of this State, without obtaining permission to do so 17from the Director.18    (cc) It is unlawful for any person to have in his or her 19possession any freshly killed species protected by this Act 20during the season closed for taking.21    (dd) It is unlawful to take any species protected by this 22Act and retain it alive except as provided by administrative 23rule.24    (ee) It is unlawful to possess any rifle while in the field 25during gun deer season except as provided in Sections 2.25 and 262.26 and administrative rules.  HB3219- 12 -LRB104 06451 BDA 16487 b1    (ff) It is unlawful for any person to take any species 2protected by this Act, except migratory waterfowl, during the 3gun deer hunting season in those counties open to gun deer 4hunting, unless he or she wears, when in the field, a cap and 5upper outer garment of a solid blaze orange color or solid 6blaze pink color, with such articles of clothing displaying a 7minimum of 400 square inches of blaze orange or solid blaze 8pink color material.9    (gg) It is unlawful during the upland game season for any 10person to take upland game with a firearm unless he or she 11wears, while in the field, a cap of solid blaze orange color or 12solid blaze pink color. For purposes of this Act, upland game 13is defined as Bobwhite Quail, Hungarian Partridge, Ring-necked 14Pheasant, Eastern Cottontail, and Swamp Rabbit.15    (hh) It shall be unlawful to kill or cripple any species 16protected by this Act for which there is a bag limit without 17making a reasonable effort to retrieve such species and 18include such in the bag limit. It shall be unlawful for any 19person having control over harvested game mammals, game birds, 20or migratory game birds for which there is a bag limit to 21wantonly waste or destroy the usable meat of the game, except 22this shall not apply to wildlife taken under Sections 2.37 or 233.22 of this Code. For purposes of this subsection, "usable 24meat" means the breast meat of a game bird or migratory game 25bird and the hind ham and front shoulders of a game mammal. It 26shall be unlawful for any person to place, leave, dump, or   HB3219- 13 -LRB104 06451 BDA 16487 b1abandon a wildlife carcass or parts of it along or upon a 2public right-of-way or highway or on public or private 3property, including a waterway or stream, without the 4permission of the owner or tenant. It shall not be unlawful to 5discard game meat that is determined to be unfit for human 6consumption.7    (ii) This Section shall apply only to those species 8protected by this Act taken within the State. Any species or 9any parts thereof, legally taken in and transported from other 10states or countries, may be possessed within the State, except 11as provided in this Section and Sections 2.35, 2.36, and 3.21.12    (jj) (Blank).13    (kk) Nothing contained in this Section shall prohibit the 14Director from issuing permits to paraplegics or to other 15persons with disabilities who meet the requirements set forth 16in administrative rule to shoot or hunt from a vehicle as 17provided by that rule, provided that such is otherwise in 18accord with this Act.19    (ll) Nothing contained in this Act shall prohibit the 20taking of aquatic life protected by the Fish and Aquatic Life 21Code or birds and mammals protected by this Act, except deer 22and fur-bearing mammals, from a boat not camouflaged or 23disguised to alter its identity or to further provide a place 24of concealment and not propelled by sail or mechanical power. 25However, only shotguns not larger than 10 gauge nor smaller 26than .410 bore loaded with not more than 3 shells of a shot   HB3219- 14 -LRB104 06451 BDA 16487 b1size no larger than lead BB or steel T (.20 diameter) may be 2used to take species protected by this Act.3    (mm) Nothing contained in this Act shall prohibit the use 4of a shotgun, not larger than 10 gauge nor smaller than a 20 5gauge, with a rifled barrel.6    (nn) It shall be unlawful to possess any species of 7wildlife or wildlife parts taken unlawfully in Illinois, any 8other state, or any other country, whether or not the wildlife 9or wildlife parts are indigenous to Illinois. For the purposes 10of this subsection, the statute of limitations for unlawful 11possession of wildlife or wildlife parts shall not cease until 122 years after the possession has permanently ended. 13    (oo) It is unlawful while deer hunting to possess or be in 14close proximity to a rifle that is not a wildlife rifle. :15        (1) to possess or be in close proximity to a rifle that 16    is not centerfire; or17        (2) to be in possession of or in close proximity to a 18    magazine that is capable of making a rifle not a single 19    shot. 20(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-837, eff. 5-13-22; 21102-932, eff. 1-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 22    (520 ILCS 5/1.2bb rep.)23    Section 10. The Wildlife Code is amended by repealing 24Section 1.2bb.